Utah statutes.
77-38-302.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Conviction" means an adjudication by a federal or state court resulting from a trial or plea, including a plea of no contest, nolo contendere, a finding of not guilty due to insanity, or not guilty but mentally ill regardless of whether the sentence was imposed or suspended.

(2)  "Fund" means the Crime Victim Reparations Fund created in Section 51-9-404.

(3)  "Memorabilia" means any tangible property of a person convicted of a first degree or capital felony, the value of which is enhanced by the notoriety gained from the conviction.

(4)  "Profit" means any income or benefit over and above the fair market value of the property that is received upon the sale or transfer of memorabilia.

